Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-208
City council; members; bond or insurance.

All members of the city council of a city of the metropolitan class shall qualify and give bond or evidence of equivalent insurance in the sum of five thousand dollars.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 8, p. 423;

C.S.1922, § 3533;

C.S.1929, § 14-208;

R.S.1943, § 14-208;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 475;

Laws 2007, LB347, § 2.

This section does not apply to "holdover officers", as they are governed by section 11-117. State ex rel. Shaw v. Rosewater, 79 Neb. 450, 113 N.W. 206 (1907).